Utah statutes.
13-42-124.   Voluntary contributions.

A provider may not solicit a voluntary contribution from an individual or an affiliate of the individual for any service provided to the individual.  A provider may accept voluntary contributions from an individual but, until 30 days after completion or termination of a plan, the aggregate amount of money received from or on behalf of the individual may not exceed the total amount the provider may charge the individual under Section 13-42-123.

